Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,118
Service of process.

Defendants may be served as in other civil actions.

Laws 1921, c. 130, § 7, p. 542;

C.S.1922, § 5682;

C.S.1929, § 76-407;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,118;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 43.

Where affidavit for constructive service contains no venue and does not show whether notary was commissioned for the county, affidavit was fatally defective. Northouse v. Torstenson, 146 Neb. 187, 19 N.W.2d 34 (1945).